District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4116

Absolute immunity for members of the Advisory Counsel; immunity for good faith conduct for others.

Repealed.

History

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-274, § 17, 44 DCR 1232
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-250, § 2, 46 DCR 1118
July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 19, 47 DCR 797

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-1116.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Temporary amendment of section: Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-118 rewrote the section.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 12-118 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-262 rewrote the section.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 12-262 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of § 24-1116 1981 Ed., see § 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Immunity From Liability Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-50, April 6, 1999, 46 DCR 3634).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-133, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6771).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Legislative Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-176, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9244).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-229, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 487).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of sections, see § 19 of the Sex Offender Registration Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-308, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2714).